Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 97.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
86-312
Nebraska Telecommunications
Relay System Fund; created; use; investment.

(1)
The Nebraska Telecommunications Relay System Fund is created. The fund shall
be used to provide a statewide telecommunications relay system and to administer
a statewide voucher program to provide specialized telecommunications equipment
to qualified deaf, hard of hearing, and speech-impaired persons in Nebraska, except that transfers may be made from
the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.

(2) Based upon the price of the equipment, vouchers shall
be issued by the program administrator to pay private vendors for all or part
of the cost of the equipment. After purchase, the recipient is the owner of
the equipment and responsible for enforcement of any warranties and repairs.

(3) Any money in the Nebraska Telecommunications Relay System
Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State
Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1990, LB 240, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 86-903;

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 26;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 141;

Laws 1995, LB 146, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 568, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 359, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1304;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 190;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 97.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.